Utah statutes.
63A-9-101.   Definitions.
(1) (a)  "Agency" means each department, commission, board, council, agency,
institution, officer, corporation, fund, division, office, committee,
authority, laboratory, library, unit, bureau, panel, or other administrative
unit of the state.
(b)  "Agency" includes the State Board of Education, the Office of Education,
each Applied Technology Center, the board of regents, the institutional
councils of each higher education institution, and each higher education
institution.
(c)  "Agency" includes the legislative and judicial branches.
(2)  "Committee" means the Motor Vehicle Review Committee created by this
chapter.
(3)  "Director" means the director of the division.
(4)  "Division" means the Division of Fleet Operations created by this
chapter.
(5)  "Executive director" means the executive director of the Department of
Administrative Services.
(6)  "Local agency" means:
(a)  a county;
(b)  a municipality;
(c)  a school district;
(d)  a local district;
(e)  a special service district;
(f)  an interlocal entity as defined under Section 11-13-103; or
(g)  any other political subdivision of the state, including a local
commission, board, or other governmental entity that is vested with the
authority to make decisions regarding the public's business.
(7) (a)  "Motor vehicle" means a self-propelled vehicle capable of carrying
passengers.
(b)  "Motor vehicle" includes vehicles used for construction and other
nontransportation purposes.
(8)  "State vehicle" means each motor vehicle owned, operated, or in the
possession of an agency.
